Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-169
Offstreet parking; facilities; lease; controls retained; business restricted.

On the creation of a motor vehicle parking facility as provided under section 17-164 for the use of the general public, the city of the second class may lease such facility to one or more operators to provide for the efficient operation of the facility. Such lease shall be let on a competitive basis, and no lease shall run for a period in excess of ten years. In granting any lease, the city shall retain such control of the facility as may be necessary to insure that the facility will be properly operated in the public interest and that the prices charged are reasonable. The provisions of sections 17-163 to 17-173 shall not be construed to authorize the city or the lessee of the facility to engage in the sale of any commodity, product, or service or to engage in any business other than the purposes set forth in section 17-164.

Laws 1957, c. 29, § 7, p. 188;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 57.